Louisiana, session 2026, HB1142.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1984.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1984.1. Annual report; market accountability
A. On or before the first day of March, the Department of Insurance shall
issue an annual insurance market accountability report covering the preceding
calendar year.
(1) The annual insurance market accountability report shall include all of the
following:
(a) Average homeowners' and auto insurance premiums changes by parish.
(b) Claims filed, claims paid, and claims denied by parish.
(c) Loss ratios and profitability by line of insurance.
(d) Market entries and exits participation by insurers.
(e) Non-renewal and cancellation rates.
(2)(a) The report shall be submitted annually to the House and Senate
committees on insurance and made publicly available on the department’s website.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2725 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1142
(b) The department shall ensure data is presented in a format that is
accessible and understandable to policymakers and the public.
B.(1) The Department of Insurance shall collect and compile data using
existing regulatory authority and data calls if necessary.
(2) The first report shall be delivered within one year of enactment.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.